Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5138YC (2) 91 ms/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 30. a. A county shall not issue a 3 county-specific identification card to any resident of the 4 county except as provided in paragraph âbâ . 5 b. (1) A county authorized pursuant to chapter 321M may 6 issue driverâs licenses, nonoperatorâs identification cards, 7 and persons with disabilities identification devices. 8 (2) A county may issue an identification card to a county 9 employee or elected official relating to the employeeâs or 10 officialâs job duties. 11 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 24. a. A city shall not issue a 14 city-specific identification card to any resident of the city 15 except as provided in paragraph âbâ . 16 b. A city may issue an identification card to a city 17 employee or elected official relating to the employeeâs or 18 officialâs job duties. 19